District of Columbia statutes.
5-1134

Repealed

Composition; term of office; quorum; removal for cause.

Repealed.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-158, § 5, 27 DCR 5127
Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-179, § 2(a), 39 DCR 8075
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 803(a), 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 4-904.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Civilian Complaint Review Board Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-274, July 23, 1992, 39 DCR 5846).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Civilian Complaint Review Board Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-292, October 19, 1992, 39 DCR 7934).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Civilian Complaint Review Board Second Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-379, January 5, 1993, 40 DCR 640).
For effective date of repeal of §§ 5-1131 to 5-1140, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-1131.
Expiration of § 2(a)(5) of Law 9-179: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 9-179 provided that § 2(a)(5) of the act shall expire 3 years from the effective date of the Civilian Complaint Review Board Amendment Act of 1992.